Wisconsin, session 2025, SB52.
do enact as follows:SB52,11Section 1. 69.20 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,2,9269.20 (2) (b) Except as provided under sub. (3), the state registrar and local 3registrars may not permit inspection of or disclose information contained in any 4record of a birth which occurred on or after September 30, 1907 January 1 of the 5year that is 100 years prior to the date of the request for inspection or disclosure for 6information if the mother of the subject of the record was not married at any time 7from the conception to the birth of the subject of the record, unless the inspection is 8by or the information is disclosed to a person who has a direct and tangible interest 9in such record.SB52,210Section 2. 69.21 (1) (a) 2. a. of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,2,161169.21 (1) (a) 2. a. A vital record, if the event which is the subject of the vital 12record occurred on or after September 30, 1907 January 1 of the year that is 100 13years prior to the date of the request for issuance of a certified copy of the vital 14record, unless the requester is a person with a direct and tangible interest in the 15record or unless the registrar has received a court order directing issuance of the 16vital record.SB52,317Section 3. 69.21 (2) (a) of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,3,31869.21 (2) (a) The state registrar or local registrar shall issue an uncertified 19copy of the vital record of one or more registrants if the subject of the vital record is 20an event occurring on or after September 30, 1907 January 1 of the year that is 100 21years prior to the date of the request for issuance of an uncertified copy of the vital 22record. The requirements of ss. 69.15 (6) (b) and 69.20 (3) (b) for disclosing 1information under s. 69.20 (1) and (2) shall apply to issuance under this paragraph 2of any copy of a vital record containing such information. Any uncertified copy 3issued under this paragraph shall have on its face a notice that it is uncertified.SB52,44Section 4. 69.21 (2) (b) of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,3,12569.21 (2) (b) The state registrar and any local registrar shall issue an 6uncertified copy of the vital record of one or more registrants, whether specified or 7not, to any person if the subject of the vital record is an event occurring before 8October 1, 1907 January 1 of the year that is 100 years prior to the date of the 9request for issuance of the uncertified copy of the vital record, and if the person 10submits a request for the copy in writing to the registrar responsible for filing or 11registering the vital record and if the request is accompanied by the fee required 12under s. 69.22 (1) (b).SB52,513Section 5. 69.21 (2) (d) 1. of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,3,201469.21 (2) (d) 1. An uncertified photocopy of a vital record for an event 15occurring before October 1, 1907 January 1 of the year that is 100 years prior to the 16date of issuance of the uncertified photocopy of the vital record, other than a vital 17record held by the state registrar and any local registrar, shall be stamped “NOT 18FOR IDENTITY PURPOSES” across its face and is subject to this paragraph but is 19not otherwise subject to the limitations of this section or the requirements of s. 2069.22.SB52,621Section 6. 69.30 (3) of the statutes is amended to read:SB52,4,22269.30 (3) Any person may copy or may make available electronically an 23uncertified copy of a vital record that is issued under s. 69.21 (2) (b) or (d) for an 24event occurring before October 1, 1907, that is issued under s. 69.21 (2) (b) or (d) 1January 1 of the year that is 100 years prior to the date of issuance of the 2uncertified copy of the vital record.SB52,4,33